Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 12. High Seas Interception of Salmon.

Sec. 16.10.750.
Findings and purpose.

The legislature finds that

the salmon fishing industry is among the state’s largest industries and generates hundreds of millions of dollars and thousands of jobs each year; the salmon fishery is vitally important to commercial, subsistence, personal use, and sport fishing interests, and to the state’s developing tourist industry;

the state is committed to maintaining and enhancing its wild stocks of salmon by careful management, by initiating a 20-year rebuilding program, and by investing in the fishing industry;

millions of Alaska salmon are being caught and injured by high seas fisheries that intercept salmon contrary to state, federal, or international law; the high seas interception of Alaska salmon defeats the state’s management and rebuilding programs, deprives the state of a return on its investment in the fishing industry, and detrimentally affects subsistence and sport fishing uses of Alaska salmon;

vessels that engage in the high seas interception of salmon can move relatively freely and undetected from region to region in the North Pacific and thus are able to harvest whatever species is most readily available or most valuable; by moving farther westward, a greater proportion of the take is Asian salmon; moving eastward results in a greater proportion of the take being Alaska salmon; although there is intermixing of Asian and North American salmon stocks, scientific evidence proves that even a minimal harvest of salmon within the migratory range of each species will contain Alaska salmon;

the illegal taking of salmon detrimentally affects the Alaska fishing industry; the illegal taking of Alaska salmon is of primary concern because of the direct and immediate effect on the state; in addition, the illegal taking of Asian salmon is also of concern because depletion of those stocks will ultimately result in a shifting of high seas fishing efforts, both legal and illegal, to Alaska salmon;

high seas interception of salmon occurs beyond the exclusive economic zone of the United States, or through incursion within the exclusive economic zone and the state’s territorial sea, by vessels that are usually not registered in this state; moreover, these vessels are not based in Alaska and can thus avoid detection more easily than Alaska-based vessels; as a practical matter, it is extremely difficult to directly or indirectly regulate the vessels themselves; it is therefore necessary to prohibit activities within the state that give aid, comfort, and financial incentives to high seas interception of salmon.

The purpose of AS

16.10.750

—

16.10.800

is to prevent resources, facilities, and expertise within the state from being available to promote or facilitate the high seas interception of salmon or the making of intercepted salmon ready for or accessible to world markets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1989)

Sec. 16.10.760.
Trafficking in intercepted salmon.

A person commits the offense of trafficking in intercepted salmon if the person

buys, sells, trades, processes, or possesses salmon, or attempts to buy, sell, trade, process, or possess salmon, with reckless disregard that the salmon has been, or will be, obtained by high seas interception;

knowingly provides financing, premises, equipment, supplies, services, power, or fuel used to buy, sell, trade, process, or possess salmon that has been, or will be, obtained by high seas interception; or

acts as a broker or middleman, or otherwise acts on behalf of another party, to arrange for or negotiate, or attempts to arrange for or negotiate, the purchase, sale, trade, processing, or possession of salmon, with reckless disregard that the salmon has been, or will be, obtained by high seas interception.

Trafficking in intercepted salmon is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For penalty of imprisonment for class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125

.

Sec. 16.10.770.
Falsification related to high seas interception of salmon.

A person commits the offense of falsification related to high seas interception of salmon if the person creates, utters, or possesses a written instrument related to salmon, or makes an assertion for the purpose of having a written instrument related to salmon created, uttered, or accepted, with reckless disregard that the salmon was obtained by high seas interception and that the written instrument or assertion conveys misleading or untrue information about the ownership, possession, processing, origin, destination, route of shipping, type, condition, or time, place, and manner of the taking of the salmon.

In this section

“utter” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.580(b)

;

“written instrument” has the meaning given in AS

11.46.580(b)

and includes ships’ logs and papers, bills of lading and sale, documents relating to processing, shipping, and customs, and information stamped on or affixed to cans, crates, containers, freight, or a means of storage or packaging.

Falsification related to high seas interception of salmon is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For penalty of imprisonment for a class C felony, see AS

12.55.125(e)

.

Sec. 16.10.780.
Assisting a vessel in high seas interception of salmon.

A person commits the offense of assisting a vessel in high seas interception of salmon if, knowing that a vessel is in possession of salmon obtained by high seas interception or that the owner or operator of the vessel intends to engage in the imminent interception of salmon, the person

moves persons, cargo, or other property to or from the vessel;

services or repairs the vessel or its equipment;

provides the vessel with power, supplies, equipment, or fuel;

provides the vessel with information, other than weather reports, capable of aiding the high seas interception of salmon or frustrating or avoiding detection, including communicating the movements, intentions, or activities of state or federal law enforcement officials or other fishing vessels; or

is in charge of a docking facility, harbor, or anchorage, and permits the vessel to dock or anchor, or to remain docked or anchored.

It is an affirmative defense, as defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

, to a violation of this section, if the person honestly and reasonably believed that the assistance provided to the vessel was necessary for humanitarian or environmental purposes or to prevent a significant loss of property. An affirmative defense under this section may not be raised, unless the person provided immediate notice, by the quickest available means, to the United States Coast Guard or the Department of Public Safety indicating the type of assistance being provided and the circumstances requiring the assistance.

In this section,

“environmental purpose” means the intent to prevent or minimize adverse ecological effects to water quality;

“humanitarian purpose” means the intent to provide medical services for a sick or injured person, or to prevent the loss of human life;

“owner or operator of the vessel” means a person who

has an ownership interest in the vessel;

has authority to control or direct the vessel’s activities; or

physically operates a vessel or its equipment.

Assisting a vessel in high seas interception of salmon is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For penalty of imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

.

Sec. 16.10.790.
Fines.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

12.55.035(b)

and (c), a person convicted of an offense under AS

16.10.760

—

16.10.780

may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding the greater of

$100,000;

three times the pecuniary gain realized by the person as a result of the offense; or

if the person is convicted under AS

16.10.760

, two times the fair market value of the salmon involved or contemplated in the commission of the offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1989)

Sec. 16.10.800.
Definitions.

In AS

16.10.750

—

16.10.800

,

“high seas interception,” “interception,” or a similar term means the unauthorized catching, taking, or harvesting of salmon for other than sport, subsistence, or personal use purposes,

throughout the migratory range of each species, by a vessel not registered under the laws of this state; or

beyond the territorial sea of the state by a vessel registered under the laws of the state;

“knowing” or “knowingly” has the meaning given for “knowingly” in AS

11.81.900(a)

;

“process” means affecting the condition or location of salmon, including preparation, packaging, storage, refrigeration, or transportation;

“reckless disregard” has the meaning given for “recklessly” in AS

11.81.900(a)

;

“salmon” means Pacific salmon and steelhead, and parts of Pacific salmon and steelhead, whether mature or immature, processed or unprocessed; and

“unauthorized” means contrary to a statute or regulation of the United States or the state, or to a treaty or international fishery agreement, or in violation of a foreign law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1989)

Cross references. —

For further definitions, see AS

16.05.940

.